New York, session 2025-2026, A1566.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 6 of section 7-119 of the election law, as 2 added by chapter 481 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 3 6. On the reverse side of such inner affirmation envelope shall be 4 printed the following statement: 5 AFFIRMATION 6 I do declare that I am a citizen of the United States, that I am duly 7 registered in the election district shown on the reverse side of this 8 envelope and I am qualified to vote in such district; that I have not 9 qualified nor do I intend to vote elsewhere, that I have not committed 10 any act nor am I under any impediment which denies me the right to vote. 11 I hereby declare that the foregoing is a true statement to the best of 12 my knowledge and belief, and I understand that if I make any material 13 false statement in the foregoing statement of early mail voter, I shall 14 be guilty of a misdemeanor. 15 Date ............... 20 ................ 16 .......................... EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00491-07-6 A. 1566--B 2 1 Signature or mark of voter 2 .......................... 3 Signature of Witness 4 (required only if voter 5 does not sign their own 6 name) 7 .......................... 8 Address of Witness 9 IMPORTANT: YOU MUST SIGN THE AFFIRMATION ON THIS ENVELOPE. 10 § 2. Subdivision 6 of section 7-122 of the election law, as amended by 11 chapter 411 of the laws of 2019, is amended to read as follows: 12 6. On the reverse side of such inner affirmation envelope shall be 13 printed the following statement: 14 AFFIRMATION 15 I do declare that I am a citizen of the United States, that I am duly 16 registered in the election district shown on the reverse side of this 17 envelope and I am qualified to vote in such district; that I will be 18 unable to appear personally on the day of the election for which this 19 ballot is voted at the polling place of the election district in which I 20 am a qualified voter because of the reason given on my application here- 21 tofore submitted; that I have not qualified nor do I intend to vote 22 elsewhere, that I have not committed any act nor am I under any imped- 23 iment which denies me the right to vote. 24 I hereby declare that the foregoing is a true statement to the best of 25 my knowledge and belief, and I understand that if I make any material 26 false statement in the foregoing statement of absentee voter, I shall be 27 guilty of a misdemeanor. 28 Date.................20..... ..................................... 29 Signature or mark of voter 30 ..................................... 31 Signature of Witness (required only 32 if voter does not sign [his or her] 33 their own name) 34 ..................................... 35 Address of Witness 36 IMPORTANT: YOU MUST SIGN THE AFFIRMATION ON THIS ENVELOPE. 37 § 3. Subdivision 3 of section 7-125 of the election law, as amended by 38 chapter 411 of the laws of 2019, is amended to read as follows: 39 3. On the reverse side of such envelope shall be printed the follow- 40 ing statement: 41 STATEMENT OF SPECIAL PRESIDENTIAL VOTER 42 I do declare I am a qualified special presidential voter of said 43 district; that I am not qualified and am not able to qualify to vote 44 elsewhere than as set forth on the reverse side of this envelope; that I 45 am a citizen of the United States; that on the date of the election for 46 which this ballot is voted, I will be at least eighteen years of age; A. 1566--B 3 1 and that I have not committed any act, nor am I under any impediment, 2 which denies me the right to vote. 3 I hereby declare that the foregoing is a true statement to the best of 4 my knowledge and belief, and I understand that if I make any material 5 false statement in the foregoing statement, I shall be guilty of a 6 misdemeanor. 7 Date.................20..... ..................................... 8 Signature or mark of voter 9 ..................................... 10 Signature of Witness (required only 11 if voter does not sign [his or her] 12 their own name) 13 ..................................... 14 Address of Witness 15 IMPORTANT: YOU MUST SIGN THE AFFIRMATION ON THIS ENVELOPE. 16 § 4. This act shall take effect one year after it shall have become a 17 law.